Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1932
Judgment prematurely rendered as error.

Rendering judgment before the action stood for trial, according to the provisions of this code, shall be deemed a clerical error.

R.S.1867, Code § 598, p. 500;

R.S.1913, § 8204;

C.S.1922, § 9157;

C.S.1929, § 20-1932;

R.S.1943, § 25-1932.

Premature default and forfeiture of bail bond on morning of day defendant was required to appear is not jurisdictional defect and became final after term. State v. Ingoldsby, 111 Neb. 787, 197 N.W. 960 (1924).